North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 71. Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

§ 106-840.
Soil and Water Conservation Commission — creation; powers and duties; compliance inspections.

There is hereby created the Soil and Water Conservation Commission of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services with the power and duty to adopt rules to be followed in the development and implementation of a soil and water conservation program.

The Soil and Water Conservation Commission has all of the following powers and duties:

To approve petitions for soil conservation districts.

To approve application for watershed plans.

Such other duties as specified in Chapter 139.

To conduct any inspections in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.

The Commission shall adopt rules consistent with the provisions of this Chapter. All rules not inconsistent with the provisions of this Chapter heretofore adopted by the Soil and Water Conservation Committee shall remain in full force and effect unless and until repealed or superseded by action of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission. All rules adopted by the Commission shall be enforced by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

An employee or agent of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission or the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may enter property, with the consent of the owner or person having control over property, at reasonable times for the purposes of investigating compliance with Commission or Department programs when the investigation is reasonably necessary to carry out the duties of the Commission. If the Commission or Department is unable to obtain the consent of the owner of the property, the Commission or Department may obtain an administrative search warrant pursuant to

G.S. 15-27.2

.

Any person who refuses entry or access to property by an employee or agent of the Commission or the Department or who willfully resists, delays, or obstructs an employee or agent of the Commission or the Department while the employee or agent is in the process of carrying out official duties after the employee or agent has obtained the consent of the owner or person having control of the property or, if consent is not obtained, after the employee or agent has obtained an administrative search warrant, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1973, c. 1262, s. 34; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 194; 1997-173, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2011-145, s. 13.22A(e), (f).

Cross References.

For notes regarding implementation of the Tar-Pamlico River Basin-Nutrient Sensitive Waters Management Strategy, see G.S. 143B-282.

Transfer of Division of Soil and Water Conservation and Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.22A(a) and (b), provides: “(a) The Division of Soil and Water Conservation is transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services with all the elements of a Type I transfer, as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

.

“(b) All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission are transferred to and vested in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25A(a)-(d), provides: “(a) Concurrently with the transfer under this act of the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall transfer at least four vacant positions in the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to be reclassified by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for the central business office of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The Department of Environment and Natural Resources, the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Office of State Budget and Management, and the Office of State Personnel shall jointly determine if any additional positions from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources should be transferred to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services due to the transfer of the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services under this section.

“(b) The Attorney General shall continue to provide legal counsel and legal support to the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation after these divisions are transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services under this act.

“(c) Subsequent to the transfer of the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services under this act, the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation, including the staff and equipment of these two divisions, may continue to occupy the office space that these two divisions occupied prior to the transfer under this act, and the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall cooperate with this continued use of the office space.

“(d) The Department of Environment and Natural Resources and the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall enter into a memorandum of understanding concerning the sharing of existing databases and any software programs used in the administration of the programs of the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation and any other matters addressed in this section in order to assure the uninterrupted continuation of services under these programs during and after the transfer of the Division of Forest Resources and the Division of Soil and Water Conservation from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services under this act.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.22A(dd), provides: “The Revisor of Statutes shall make the conforming statutory changes necessary to reflect the transfers under subsections (a) and (b) of this section. The Revisor of Statutes may correct any reference in the General Statutes to the statutes that are recodified by this section and any other conforming changes necessitated by this section.” Pursuant to that provision, conforming changes have been made.

§ 106-841.
Soil and Water Conservation Commission — members; selection; removal; compensation; quorum; services.

The Soil and Water Conservation Commission of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall be composed of seven members appointed by the Governor. The Commission shall be composed of the following members:

The president, first vice-president, and immediate past president of the North Carolina Association of Soil and Water Conservation Districts. Vacancies arising in any of these positions shall be filled through appointment by the Governor upon the nomination by the executive committee of the North Carolina Association of Soil and Water Conservation Districts;

Three supervisor members nominated by the North Carolina Association of Soil and Water Conservation Districts from its own membership representing the three major geographical regions of the State and appointed by the Governor;

One member appointed at large by the Governor.

The members of the Commission, except those members serving in an ex officio capacity, shall be appointed for terms of three years and shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Any appointment to fill a vacancy on the Commission created by the resignation, dismissal, death or disability of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.

The office of member of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission may be held concurrently with any other elective or appointive office, in addition to the maximum number of offices permitted to be held by one person under

G.S. 128-1.1

.

The Governor shall have the power to remove any member of the Commission from office for misfeasance, malfeasance, and nonfeasance according to the provisions of G.S. 143B-13.

The members of the Commission shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

.

A majority of the Commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

All clerical and other services required by the Commission shall be supplied by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1973, c. 1262, s. 35; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(136); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2002-176, s. 2; 2003-198, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 13.22A(e), (g).

§ 106-842.
Soil and Water Conservation Commission — officers.

The Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall have a chair and a vice-chair. The chair shall be designated by the Governor from among the members of the Commission to serve as chair at the pleasure of the Governor. The vice-chair shall be elected by and from the members of the Commission and shall serve for a term of two years or until the expiration of the vice-chair’s regularly appointed term.

History.

1973, c. 1262, s. 36; 2006-79, s. 7; 2011-145, s. 13.22A(e).

§ 106-843.
Soil and Water Conservation Commission — meetings.

The Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall meet at least quarterly and may hold special meetings at any time and place within the State at the call of the chair or upon the written request of at least four members.

History.

1973, c. 1262, s. 37; 2006-79, s. 8; 2011-145, s. 13.22A(e).

§ 106-844.
Soil and Water Conservation Account.

The Soil and Water Conservation Account is established as a nonreverting account within the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The Account consists of revenue credited to the Account from the sale of soil and water conservation special license plates. The Commission shall use the revenue from the account to fund environmental education and water quality education in North Carolina.

History.

1997-477, s. 5; 1997-443, s. 11A.123; 2011-145, s. 13.22A(e), (dd).

§§ 106-845 through 106-849.

Reserved for future codification purposes.